District of Columbia statutes.
34-1437

Renewable electricity tracking system.

(a)

The Commission shall select a market-based renewable electricity tracking system to facilitate the creation and transfer of renewable energy credits.

(b)

The Commission may designate the Energy Office to administer the electricity tracking system. The Commission or the Energy Office may contract with a for-profit or a nonprofit entity to assist in the administration of the electricity tracking system required under this section.

(c)

To the extent practicable, the tracking system shall be the generation attributes tracking system developed by PJM Interconnection.

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-340, § 9, 52 DCR 2285